Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1568
Execution; satisfaction; payment by debtors of judgment debtor.

After the issuing of execution against property, any person indebted to the judgment debtor may pay to the sheriff the amount of his debt, or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy the execution, and the sheriff's receipt shall be a sufficient discharge for the amount so paid or directed to be credited by the judgment creditor on the execution.

R.S.1867, Code § 537, p. 488;

R.S.1913, § 8116;

C.S.1922, § 9052;

C.S.1929, § 20-1570;

R.S.1943, § 25-1568.

This section relates to examination of the judgment debtor's debtor. Clarke v. Nebraska Nat. Bank, 57 Neb. 314, 77 N.W. 805 (1899).